Washington statutes.
RCW 35.23.261

Audit and allowance of demands against city.

All demands against the city shall be presented to and audited by the city council in accordance with such regulations as it may by ordinance prescribe; and upon the allowance of a demand, the clerk shall draw a warrant upon the treasurer for it, which warrant shall be countersigned by the mayor and shall specify for what purpose it is drawn and out of which fund it is to be paid.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.24.260. Prior: 1915 c 184 s 19; 1890 p 186 s 119; RRS s 9133. Formerly RCW 35.24.260.]